Nevada, session 83, AB231.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 690C.260 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
690C.260 1. A service contract must:
(a) Be written in language that is understandable and printed in a
typeface that is easy to read.
(b) Indicate that it is insured by a contractual liability insurance
policy if it is so insured, and include the name and address of the
issuer of the policy or that it is backed by the full faith and credit of
the provider if the service contract is not insured by a contractual
liability insurance policy.
(c) Include the amount of any deductible that the holder is
required to pay.
(d) Include the name and address of the provider and, if
applicable:
(1) The name and address of the administrator; and
(2) The name of the holder, if provided by the holder.
 The names and addresses of such persons are not required to be
preprinted on the service contract and may be added to the service
contract at the time of the sale.
(e) Include the purchase price of the service contract. The
purchase price must be determined pursuant to a schedule of fees
established by the provider. The purchase price is not required to be
preprinted on the service contract and may be negotiated with the
holder and added to the service contract at the time of sale.
(f) Include a description of the goods covered by the service
contract.
(g) Specify the duties of the provider and any limitations,
exceptions or exclusions. If the service contract is a home warranty
service contract, the duties of the provider must include, without
limitation, the duty to:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraphs (2) and
(3), ensure that any goods described in the service contract that
the provider is obligated to repair or replace in the event the goods
become defective are restored within 14 business days after
receiving notice from the holder that the goods are defective.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (3),
ensure that any air conditioner, furnace or heater in a home or
dwelling that the provider is obligated to repair or replace in the
event that the air conditioner, furnace or heater becomes defective
-
*AB231_R1*

– 3 –
is restored within 5 business days after receiving notice from the
holder that the air conditioner, furnace or heater is defective. If
the provider fails to restore the air conditioner, furnace or heater
within that period, the provider shall provide to the holder a per
diem allowance for lodging at the same rate as the comparable
rate established for employees of the Federal Government by the
Administrator of General Services pursuant to 5 U.S.C. § 5707
until the air conditioner, furnace or heater is restored.
(3) If the provider restores any goods and the goods become
defective within 14 business days after the date on which the goods
were restored, ensure that the goods are restored within 2 business
days after receiving notice from the holder that the goods are
defective.
(h) If the service contract covers a motor vehicle, indicate
whether replacement parts that are not made for or by the original
manufacturer of the motor vehicle may be used to comply with the
terms of the service contract.
(i) Include any restrictions on transferring or renewing the
service contract.
(j) Include the terms, restrictions or conditions for cancelling the
service contract before it expires and the procedure for cancelling
the service contract. The conditions for cancelling the service
contract must include, without limitation, the provisions of
NRS 690C.270.
(k) Include the duties of the holder under the contract, including,
without limitation, the duty to protect against damage to the goods
covered by the service contract or to comply with any instructions
included in the owner’s manual for the goods.
(l) Indicate whether the service contract authorizes the holder to
recover consequential damages.
(m) Indicate whether any defect in the goods covered by the
service contract existing on the date the contract is purchased is not
covered under the service contract.
2. A provider shall not allow, make or cause to be made a false
or misleading statement in any of the service contracts of the
provider or intentionally omit a material statement that causes a
service contract to be misleading. The Commissioner may require
the provider to amend any service contract that the Commissioner
determines is false or misleading.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Home warranty service contract” means a service
contract that covers only the structural components, appliances or
home systems of a residence, including, without limitation, the
electrical, heating, cooling and plumbing systems and other
similar systems of a residence.
-
*AB231_R1*

– 4 –
(b) “Restored” means restoration to a sound working
condition by replacing the goods or any part thereof, or by
correcting what is inoperative.
Sec. 2. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to service
contracts entered into on or after October 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB231_R1*